Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,125
Summons.

Such statement shall be filed in the clerk's office, and summons issued and served in the same manner as hereinbefore provided for the commencement of actions in the district court.

R.S.1867, Code § 708, p. 517;

R.S.1913, § 8332;

C.S.1922, § 9284;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,116;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,125.

For issuance and service of summons, see Chapter 25, article 5.

Defendant is required to answer in the usual way contemplated by code of civil procedure. State ex rel. Johnson v. Consumers Public Power Dist., 142 Neb. 114, 5 N.W.2d 202 (1942).